en: pomegranate juice, juice of pomegranate
da: granatæblesaft
de: Granatapfelsaft
es: zumo de granada, jugo de granada
fi: granaattiomenamehu
fr: jus de grenade
hr: sok od nara
it: succo di melagrana
pl: sok z granatu

en: pure pomegranate juice
de: reiner Granatapfelsaft
es: jugo de granada puro
fr: pur jus de grenade
hr: čisti sok od nara
it: succo di melagrana puro

en: Directly squeezed natural pomegranate juice
fr: jus de grenade pressé
it: succo di melograno naturale spremuto direttamente

en: organic pomegranate juice
fi: luomugranaattiomenamehu, luomu granaattiomenamehu
fr: Jus de Grenade issu de l'agriculture biologique
hr: organski sok od nara
it: succo di melograno biologico

en: pomegranate juice from concentrate, pomegranate juice from natural concentrated pomegranate juice
de: Granatapfelsaft aus Granatapfelsaftkonzentrat
fr: jus de grenade à base de concentré, Jus de grenade à base de jus de grenade concentré
hr: sok od nara iz koncentrata
it: Succo di melagrana a base di succo concentrato
pl: sok z granatów z koncentratu, sok z granatów z zagęszczonego soku

en: custard apple, cherimoya
de: Rahmapfel
es: chirimoya
hr: kremasta jabuka
it: mela crema, frutto dell'Annona reticulata

en: bullocks heart
la: Annona reticulata

en: persimmon, sharon fruit, khaki, kaki
af: boomtamatie
ar: كاكي
bg: райска ябълка
bn: পার্সিমন
ca: caqui
cs: kaki
da: kakifrugt
de: Kaki, Sharonfrucht
el: λωτός
eo: persimono
es: caqui
et: hurmaa
eu: kaki
fa: خرمالو
fr: kaki
ga: dátphluma
gu: ટીમરુ
hi: तेंदू
hr: dragun, kaki jabuka
hy: խուրմա
id: persimmon
is: döðluplóma
it: cachi
ja: 柿
ko: 감
ks: تینٛدٕ
lt: persimonas
mk: јапонско јаболко
ml: പെഴ്സിമെൻ
ms: pisang kaki
my: တည်
nb: kaki
ne: हलुवावेद
nl: kaki
pa: ਤੇਂਦੂ
pl: kaki, persymona
ps: املوک
pt: dióspiro
ro: hurma
ru: хурма
sl: kaki
so: yanmood
sq: hurma
sr: персимон
sv: persimon, kaki
ta: சீமைப் பனிச்சை
th: พลับ
tt: хөрмә
uk: хурма
za: lwgndae
zh: 柿

en: persimmon juice
de: Kaki Saft
es: zumo de caqui, jugo de caqui
hr: sok od kakija
it: succo di cachi
sv: kakijuice

en: raw persimmon pulp, persimmon pulp
fr: pulpe de kaki
it: polpa di cachi

en: raspberry, raspberries
af: Framboos
an: Chordón
ar: عليق
bg: малина, малини
br: Flamboez
bs: Malina
ca: Gerd, gerds
cs: Malina, maliny
cy: Mafon cochion
da: hindbær
de: Himbeeren, Himbeere
eo: Frambo
es: frambuesa
fa: تمشک
fi: vadelma
fr: framboise
ga: Sú craobh
gd: Sùbh-craoibh
hi: रसभरी
hr: malina, maline, od malina, plod maline
ht: Franbwaz
hu: málna
hy: Ազնվամորի
io: Frambo
it: lamponi, lampone
ja: ラズベリー
kk: Таңқурай
kn: ರಾಸ್‍ಬೆರಿ
ko: 라즈베리
kv: Ӧмидз
lo: ໝາກຟະລຳບວດ
lt: avietė
lv: aveņu
mk: Малина
mr: रास्पबेरी
ms: Raspberi
mt: Lampuna
nb: bringebær
nl: framboos, frambozen
nn: bringebær, bringbær
nv: Dzidzé łikaní dinilchííʼígíí
pl: malina, maliny, malinowy, malinowa, malinowe, malin, owoc maliny
pt: framboesas
ro: zmeură
ru: Малина
sd: راسپ بيري
sk: Malina, maliny, malinové
sr: Малина
sv: hallon
sw: Mrasiberi
ta: ராஸ்பெரி
te: కోరిందపండు
th: แรสเบอร์รี
tl: Prambuwesas
ty: Rahipere
uz: Malina
zh: 樹莓

en: red raspberries
de: Rote Himbeeren
fr: Framboises rouges
hr: crvene maline
it: lamponi rossi

en: whole raspberry
da: hele hindbær
de: ganze Himbeeren, Himbeeren ganz
fr: Framboises entières
hr: cijela malina
it: lampone intero
nl: hele frambozen

fr: purée de framboise concentrée
de: konzentriertes Himbeerpuree
es: puré de frambuesa concentrado
fi: vadelmapyreetiiviste
pt: concentrado de polme de framboesa

en: raspberry juice
bg: сок от малина, сок от малини
de: Himbeersaft
es: Zumo de frambuesa, jugo de frambuesa
fi: vadelmamehu, vadelmatäysmehu
fr: jus de framboise
hr: sok od maline
it: succo di lamponi
lv: aveņu sula
nl: Frambozensap
pl: sok malinowy, sok z malin, sok z maliny
ru: Малиновый сок
sv: hallonjuice

en: raspberry juice from concentrated juice
de: Himbeersaft aus Konzentrat, himbeersaft aus himbeersaftkonzentrat
fi: vadelmamehu tiivisteestä, vadelmatäysmehu tiivisteestä
fr: jus de framboise à base de concentré
hr: sok od maline od koncentrianog soka
it: succo di lamponi a base di concentrato
nl: frambozensap uit sapconcentraat
pl: sok malinowy z zagęszczonego soku malinowego, sok malinowy z koncentratu
sv: hallonjuice från koncentrat

en: concentrated raspberry juice, raspberry juice concentrate
de: Himbeerdicksaft
es: jarabe de frambuesas, sirope de frambuesas
fi: vadelmamehutiiviste
fr: jus de framboise concentré
hr: koncentrirani sok od maline
it: Succo di lampone concentrato
nl: frambozendiksap
pl: zagęszczony sok malinowy, zagęszczony sok z maliny, skoncentrowany sok malinowy, skoncentrowany sok z owoców malin

en: concentrated raspberry juice from concentrate
de: Himbeerdicksaft aus Konzentrat
es: jarabe de frambuesas de concentrado, sirope de frambuesas de concentrado
fr: concentré de jus de framboise
hr: koncentrirani sok od maline od koncentrata
it: Succo di lampone concentrato da concentrato
nl: frambozendiksap concentraat
pl: zagęszczony sok malinowy z koncentratu, zagęszczony sok malinowy z zagęszczonego soku malinowego

en: raspberry liqueur
de: Himbeerlikör
es: licor de frambuesas
fi: vadelmalikööri
fr: liqueur de framboises
hr: liker od maline
it: liquore di lamponi
nl: frambozenlikeur

en: raspberry sauce
de: Himbeersauce de:Himbeersoße
fr: sauce aux framboises, sauce à la framboise, sauce framboise
hr: umak od malina
it: salsa di lamponi